src/verb.lexc
LEXICON 581
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	561;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Desr:+sA	565;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	557;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	554;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	568;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Opt:+yA	572;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	571;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	570;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	567;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3pl:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Verb+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+SinceDoingSo:+yAlH	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+When^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutBeingAbleToHaveDoneSo:+yAmAdAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAksHzHn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom^DB+Verb+Zero+Pres:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+Prop+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+Prop+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+NotAbleState+A3sg:+yAmAzlHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	579;
^DB+Verb+Hastily:+yHver	580;
^DB+Verb+Repeat+Imp:+yAdur	562;

LEXICON 580
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 579
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	577;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero^DB+Noun+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	574;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	573;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	576;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
+Prog2:+mAktA	578;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 578
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 577
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 576
+A3pl:+lAr	575;

LEXICON 575
+Cond:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 574
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 573
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 572
+A1pl:+lHm	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;

LEXICON 571
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A2sg:+n	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 570
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	569;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 569
+Cop:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 568
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 567
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Cop:+dHr	566;

LEXICON 566
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 565
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	564;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	563;

LEXICON 564
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 563
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 562
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 561
+A1pl:+Hz	#;
+A1sg:+Hm	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	560;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cond:+ysA	559;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	558;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 560
+Narr:+mHS	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 559
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 558
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 557
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	556;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+ymHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	555;

LEXICON 556
+Cop:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 555
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 554
+A2sg:+sHn	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	553;
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
+Past:+ydH	552;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 553
+Cond:+ysA	#;
+Cop:+dHr	#;
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 552
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 551
+Neg+Aor:+mA	457;
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	480;
+Neg:+mA	465;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	505;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+yAmA	#;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	510;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+dHr	#;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos+Imp:+dHr	467;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos:+dHr	503;
^DB+Verb+Caus:+dHr	550;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos+Imp+A2sg:+Hl	#;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos+Imp:+Hl	466;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos:+Hl	479;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	519;

LEXICON 550
+Neg+Aor:+mA	521;
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	536;
+Neg:+mA	526;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	538;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	541;
^DB+Verb+Caus+Pos:+t	542;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos+Imp:+Hl	527;
^DB+Verb+Pass+Pos:+Hl	535;
^DB+Verb+Pass:+Hl	549;

LEXICON 549
+Neg+Aor:+mA	543;
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg:+mA	546;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	547;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	548;

LEXICON 548
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;

LEXICON 547
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 546
+Fut:+yAcAk	545;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	544;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 545
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 544
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 543
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 542
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;

LEXICON 541
+Narr:+mHS	540;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	539;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 540
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 539
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;

LEXICON 538
(+z)	537;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 537
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 536
+A2pl:+yHn	#;

LEXICON 535
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor:+Hr	531;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Desr+A3sg:+sA	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	529;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Neces:+mAlH	528;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	532;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	530;
+Prog2+A3sg:+mAktA	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Adverb+ByDoingSo:+yArAk	#;
^DB+Adverb+When:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+When^DB+Noun+Zero+A3sg+Pnon:+yHncA	#;
^DB+Adverb+WithoutHavingDoneSo:+mAdAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Verb+Able:+yAbil	534;

LEXICON 534
+Aor+A3sg:+Hr	#;
+Aor^DB+Adj+Zero:+Hr	#;
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Fut:+yAcAk	533;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;

LEXICON 533
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 532
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 531
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 530
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 529
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 528
+Cop+A3sg:+dHr	#;

LEXICON 527
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 526
+Fut+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	522;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Opt:+yA	525;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	524;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	523;
^DB+Adj+FutPart+Pnon:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg+Pnon:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf3+A3sg:+yHS	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 525
+A1pl:+lHm	#;

LEXICON 524
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A2pl:+nHz	#;

LEXICON 523
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 522
^DB+Adverb+While:+yken	#;

LEXICON 521
(+z)	520;
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 520
+Cond+A3sg:+ysA	#;

LEXICON 519
+Neg+Aor:+mA	514;
+Neg+Imp+A2sg:+mA	#;
+Neg+Imp:+mA	518;
+Neg:+mA	512;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg+Aor:+yAmA	515;
^DB+Verb+Able+Neg:+yAmA	517;

LEXICON 518
+A3sg:+sHn	#;

LEXICON 517
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr:+mHS	516;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 516
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 515
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 514
(+z)	513;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 513
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 512
+Narr+A3sg:+mHS	#;
+Narr^DB+Adj+Zero:+mHS	#;
+Neces+A3sg:+mAlH	#;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	511;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AsLongAs:+dHkCA	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 511
+A1pl:+k	#;

LEXICON 510
+Fut:+yAcAk	508;
+Opt+A3sg:+yA	#;
+Past+A3sg:+dH	#;
+Past:+dH	509;
+Prog1+A3sg:+Hyor	#;
+Prog1:+Hyor	507;
^DB+Adj+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart+Pnon:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PastPart:+dHk	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adj+PresPart^DB+Noun+Zero:+yAn	#;
^DB+Adverb+AfterDoingSo:+yHp	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart+A3sg:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+FutPart:+yAcAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf1+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mAk	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+Inf2+A3sg:+mA	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg+Pnon+Nom:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart+A3sg:+dHk	#;
^DB+Noun+PastPart:+dHk	#;

LEXICON 509
+A1pl:+k	#;
+A1sg:+m	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	#;

LEXICON 508
+A1sg:+yHm	#;

LEXICON 507
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A1sg:+yHm	#;
+A2pl:+sHnHz	#;
+A3pl:+lAr	506;

LEXICON 506
+Past:+ydH	#;

LEXICON 505
(+z)	504;
+A1pl:+yHz	#;
+A3sg:+z	#;
^DB+Adj+Zero:+z	#;

LEXICON 504
+Past+A3sg:+ydH	#;
